Washington statutes.
RCW 21.40.020

Award—Original material—Successful enforcement.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the securities administrator may award an amount to one or more whistleblowers who voluntarily provide original information in writing, and in the form and manner required by the securities administrator, to the securities division that leads to the successful enforcement of an administrative or judicial action under chapter 21.20 RCW.

[ 2023 c 149 s 3.]